errortag-src/propernoun-sme-morph.txt
LEXICON NYSTØ-femsur
 +N+Prop+Sur:%>  NYSTØDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 +N+Prop+Fem:%> NYSTØDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON NYSTØ-surplc
 +N+Prop+Sur:%>  NYSTØDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  NYSTØDECL ;
:%> PLACELASH ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-LOAN-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  NYSTØDECL-LOAN ;
 +Use/Sub:%> PLACELASH ; !

LEXICON NYSTØ-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  NYSTØDECL ;
:%> PLACELASH ;

LEXICON NYSTØ ! Vowel-final, heavy syll
 +N+Prop:%> NYSTØDECL ;
 
LEXICON NYSTØ-LOAN ! Vowel-final, heavy syll
 +N+Prop:%> NYSTØDECL-LOAN ;


LEXICON NYSTØDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ NYSTØ-OBL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ NYSTØ-DC ; !moved up to -plc

LEXICON NYSTØDECL-LOAN
 @U.Cap.Obl@ NYSTØ-OBL-LOAN ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ NYSTØ-DC ; !moved up to -plc

LEXICON NYSTØ-OBL
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +CmpN/SgN: Rreal ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%:s K ; ! Ny^stø:s
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:a   Rreal ; ! ! for placenames !
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:a- Rreal ; ! ! for placenames !
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:-  Rreal ; ! ! for placenames !
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:    Rreal ; ! ! for placenames !
 NYOBL ;
 +Use/Sub:%: NYOBL ; ! to NYOBL, optional delimiter marks. sub?
 +Use/Sub:%- NYOBL ; !
 +Use/Sub:'7 NYOBL ; !

LEXICON NYSTØ-OBL-LOAN
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +CmpN/SgN: Rreal ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%:s K ; ! Ny^stø:s
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:a   Rreal ; ! ! for placenames !
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:a- Rreal ; ! ! for placenames !
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:-  Rreal ; ! ! for placenames !
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:    Rreal ; ! ! for placenames !
 +Use/Sub: NYOBL ; !
 +Use/Sub:%: NYOBL ; ! to NYOBL, optional delimiter marks. sub?
 +Use/Sub:%- NYOBL ; !
 +Use/Sub:'7 NYOBL ; !

LEXICON NYOBL
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Acc: K ;
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
 +Sg+Loc:s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:a K ; !
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:a K ; !
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:aj K ; !
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:ij K ; !
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:as K ; !
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:an K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:ajn K ; !
 +Ess+Use/Sub:an K ; !
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:at K ; !
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:ajd K ; !
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:ajd K ; !
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:ajde K ; !
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:ajn K ; !
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:ajgujn K ; !


LEXICON LONDON-SUBSTANDARD !SUB
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:i K ; !
 ! This is for "Statskog:i"

!These not yet in use.
!LEXICON PLACE-DIM-obj
! +N+Prop+Obj:%> PLACE-DIMDECL ;
!
!LEXICON PLACE-DIM-org
! +N+Prop+Org:%> PLACE-DIMDECL ;

!LEXICON PLACE-DIM-mal
! +N+Prop+Mal:%>  PLACE-DIMDECL ;

!LEXICON PLACE-DIM-fem
! +N+Prop+Fem:%>  PLACE-DIMDECL ;
!
LEXICON PLACE-DIM-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> PLACE-DIMDECL ;
!
LEXICON PLACE-DIM-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> PLACE-DIMDECL ;
:%> PLACELASH ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIM-ani
 +N+Prop+Ani:%> PLACE-DIMDECL ;


!LEXICON PLACE-DIM
! +Der/š+Der/Dimin:%> PLACE-DIMDECL ;
!
LEXICON PLACE-DIMDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIM-OBL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ PLACE-DIM-DC ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIM-OBL
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X7 Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgN: Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X7- Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:- Rreal ; !
 +Ess:in K ;
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub: K ; !
 +CmpN/SgG:a Rreal ; !compound also for these
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/NG: Rreal ;  !compound also for these
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:a- Rreal ; ! !compound also for these
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:- Rreal ;  ! !compound also for these
 +Sg+Acc:a K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub: K ; !
 +Pl+Nom:at K ;
 :i PLACE-DIM-i ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIM-i
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
 +Sg+Loc:s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd K ;
 +CmpN/PlG:jd Rreal ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIMV !DIMINV for propernouns
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +CmpN/SgN: Rreal ;                    !Test this
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:- Rreal ; !
 +Sg+Acc:aX4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:aX4 K ;
 +CmpN/SgG:aX4 Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:aX4- Rreal ; !
 +Sg+Ill:aX3j K ;
 +Sg+Loc:aX4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:aX4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:aX5jn K ;
 +Pl+Nom:aX4t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:aX5jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:aX5jd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:aX5jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:aX5jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:aX5jgujn K ;
 +Ess:an K ;

LEXICON C-FI-NEN-sur
! For Finnish surnames. Itkonen.
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> C-FI-NENDECL ;

LEXICON C-FI-NEN-plc
! For Finnish placenames with ending -nen. Kaustinen.
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> C-FI-NENDECL ;
 NENPLACELASH ;



LEXICON C-FI-NEN-surplc
! For Finnish names with ending -nen that are used both surnames and placenames. Huittinen.
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> C-FI-NENDECL ;
 NENPLACELASH ;






! Finnish Itkonen, lexicon for Finnish nen-names

LEXICON C-FI-NEN
 +N+Prop:%> C-FI-NENDECL ;

LEXICON C-FI-NENDECL  ! Finnish names
 :s FI-S ;            ! In Fin^land, they are declined with
                      ! Itkosa as the oblique stem.
 :nen9 LONDONDECL ;   ! In Norway, they are declined as CNAME
                      ! with ordinary genitive Itkonena

! Finnish Itkosa
LEXICON FI-S
 @U.Cap.Obl@ FI-S-OBL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ FI-S-DC ; !moved up to -plc

LEXICON FI-S-OBL
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:   Rreal ; ! For names
 +CmpN/SgG:- Rreal ; !    For names
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Acc:a K ;
 +Sg+Ill:ij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:is K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:ijn K ;
 +Ess:in K ;
 +Pl+Nom:at K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ijd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:ijd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:ijn K ;
 +Pl+Com:ijgujn K ;

!LEXICON FI-S-DC						!moved up to -plc
! +Der/laš:lažž DEARVVASLAS ;

LEXICON LONDON-atr		!SUB
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON LONDON-sur ! Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:is
! Different lexicon for personal surnames.
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> LONDONDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON LONDON-ani
 +N+Prop+Ani:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDON-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> LONDONDECL-LOAN ;

LEXICON LONDON-orgsur
 +N+Prop+Org:%> LONDONDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDON-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> LONDONDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON LONDON-malplc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> LONDONDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> LONDONDECL ;
:%> PLACELASH ;

LEXICON LONDON-malsur
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> LONDONDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDON-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%> LONDONDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON LONDON-malfem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%> LONDONDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> LONDONDECL-LOAN ;
 +Use/Sub:%> PLACELASH ; !

LEXICON LONDON-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> LONDONDECL ;
:%> PLACELASH ;


LEXICON LONDON-surplc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> LONDONDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> LONDONDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
:%> PLACELASH ;


LEXICON LONDON-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> LONDONDECL-LOAN ;

LEXICON LONDON
 +N+Prop:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDONDECL ! Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:is
 @U.Cap.Obl@ LONDON-UCASE ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ LONDON-DC ;

LEXICON LONDONDECL-LOAN ! Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:is
 @U.Cap.Obl@ LONDON-UCASE-LOAN ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ LONDON-DC ;


LEXICON LONDON-UCASE
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +CmpN/SgN: Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:- Rreal ; !
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%:s K ; ! ! Ty^dal:s
     LONDON-OBL ;
 +Use/Sub:%: LONDON-OBL ; ! (If we understand SGL correctly)
 +Use/Sub:%- LONDON-OBL ; !
 +Use/Sub:%: LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; ! (:i ill only)
 +Use/Sub:%- LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; ! (-i ill only)
 
LEXICON LONDON-UCASE-LOAN
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +CmpN/SgN: Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:- Rreal ; !
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%:s K ; ! ! Ty^dal:s
 +Use/Sub: LONDON-OBL ; !
 +Use/Sub:%: LONDON-OBL ; ! (If we understand SGL correctly)
 +Use/Sub:%- LONDON-OBL ; !
 +Use/Sub:%: LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; ! (:i ill only)
 +Use/Sub:%- LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; ! (-i ill only)


!LEXICON LONDON-DC
! +Der/laš:lažž DEARVVASLAS ;

LEXICON LONDON-OBL
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG: K ;
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Acc:a K ;
 +Sg+Ill:ij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:is K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:ijn K ;
 +Ess:in K ;
 +Pl+Nom:at K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ijd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:ijd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:ijn K ;
 +Pl+Com:ijgujn K ;
 
LEXICON DUBAI-plc
!Like BERN for names ending Vowel-i
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> BERN-UCASE-LOAN ;
:%>a PLACELASH ;

LEXICON DUBAI-fem
!Like BERN for names ending Vowel-i
 +N+Prop+Fem:%> BERN-UCASE-LOAN ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;

LEXICON DUBAI-mal
!Like BERN for names ending Vowel-i
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> BERN-UCASE-LOAN ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;
 
LEXICON DUBAI-sur
!Like BERN for names ending Vowel-i
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> BERN-UCASE-LOAN ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
 
LEXICON DUBAI-LOAN-surplc
!Like BERN for names ending Vowel-i
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> BERN-UCASE-LOAN ;
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> BERN-UCASE-LOAN ;
 +Use/Sub:%>a PLACELASH ; !


LEXICON DUBAI-org
!Like BERN for names ending Vowel-i
 +N+Prop+Org:%> BERN-UCASE-LOAN ;


LEXICON BERN-ani
!Different lexicon for animals. Eurokas.
 +N+Prop+Ani:%> BERNDECL ;

LEXICON BERN-mal
! Different lexicon for male persons. Finn. Torfinn.
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> BERNDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON BERN-surmal
! Different lexicon for male persons & personal surnames.
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> BERNDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON BERN-fem
! Different lexicon for female persons. Aud^hild.
 +N+Prop+Fem:%> BERNDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON BERN-femplc
! Different lexicon for female persons and place names.
 +N+Prop+Fem:%> BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> BERNDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

!LEXICON BERN-surfem ! Not in use.
! Different lexicon for female persons & personal surnames.
! +N+Prop+Fem:%> BERNDECL ;
! +N+Prop+Sur:%> BERNDECL ;
! @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB

LEXICON BERN-sur
! Different lexicon for personal surnames. Blind
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> BERNDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON BERN-LOAN-plc
! Different lexicon for place names. Bern.
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> BERNDECL-LOAN ;
 +Use/Sub:%>a PLACELASH ; !

LEXICON BERN-plc
! Different lexicon for place names. Bern.
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> BERNDECL ;
:%>a PLACELASH ;

LEXICON BERN-LOAN-surplc
! Different lexicon for names that are both surnames and places.
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> BERNDECL-LOAN ;
 +Use/Sub:%>a PLACELASH ; !

LEXICON BERN-surplc
! Different lexicon for names that are both surnames and places.
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> BERNDECL ;
:%>a PLACELASH ;


LEXICON BERN-org
! Different lexicon for organisations. Microsoft.
 +N+Prop+Org:%> BERNDECL ;
 
LEXICON BERN-LOAN-org
! Different lexicon for organisations. Microsoft.
 +N+Prop+Org:%> BERNDECL-LOAN ;

LEXICON BERN-orgsur
 +N+Prop+Org:%> BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> BERNDECL ;

LEXICON BERN-obj
! Different lexicon for objects, concrete and abstract. Word.
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> BERNDECL ;
 
LEXICON BERN-LOAN-obj
! Different lexicon for objects, concrete and abstract. Word.
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> BERNDECL-LOAN ;


LEXICON BERN-objsur
! Different lexicon for names that are both objects and surnames.
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> BERNDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> BERNDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON BERN
 +N+Prop:%> BERNDECL ;

LEXICON BERNDECL ! Final foot structure (X) => Loc:as
 @U.Cap.Obl@ BERN-UCASE ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ BERN-DC ; !moved up to -plc
